Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7877.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 39-27.1-2, 39-27.1-3, 39-27.1-4, 39-27.1-5, 39-27.1-6 and 39-27.1-
7 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-27.1 entitled "Appliance and Equipment Energy and Water
Efficiency Standards Act of 2021" are hereby amended to read as follows:
39-27.1-2. Definitions.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Agency" means the Rhode Island office of energy resources.
(1)(2) “Commercial dishwasher” means a machine designed to clean and sanitize plates,
pots, pans, glasses, cups, bowls, utensils, and trays by applying sprays of detergent solution (with
or without blasting media granules) and a sanitizing rinse.
(2)(3) “Commercial fryer” means an appliance, including a cooking vessel, in which oil is
placed to such a depth that the cooking food is essentially supported by displacement of the cooking
fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to the cooking fluid by means of an
immersed electric element of band-wrapped vessel (electric fryers) or by heat transfer from gas
burners through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through the cooking fluid (gas
fryers).
(3)(4) “Commercial hot-food holding cabinet” means a heated, fully enclosed compartment
with one or more solid or transparent doors designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that
has been cooked using a separate appliance. “Commercial hot-food holding cabinet” does not

include heated glass merchandizing cabinets, drawer warmers, or cook-and-hold appliances.
(4)(5) “Commercial oven” means a chamber designed for heating, roasting, or baking food
by conduction, convection, radiation, and/or electromagnetic energy.
(5)(6) “Commercial steam cooker,” also known as “compartment steamer,” means a device
with one or more food-steaming compartments in which the energy in the steam is transferred to
the food by direct contact. Models may include countertop models, wall-mounted models, and floor
models mounted on a stand, pedestal, or cabinet-style base.
(6)(7) “Commissioner” means the commissioner of energy resources at the Rhode Island
office of energy resources, appointed pursuant to § 42-140-4.
(7)(8) “Compensation” means money or any other valuable thing, regardless of form,
received or to be received by a person for services rendered.
(9) “Computer server” means a computer that provides services and manages networked
resources for client devices (e.g., desktop computers, notebook computers, thin clients, wireless
devices, personal digital assistants, internet protocol telephones, other computer servers, or other
network devices).
(10) “Computer server power supply unit” means a device that converts AC or DC input
power to one or more DC power outputs for the purpose of powering a computer server and that is
self-contained, physically separable from the motherboard and that connects to the system via a
removable or hard-wired electrical connection.
(11) The following definitions refer to expanded scope electric motors:
(i) “Electric motor’’ means a machine that converts electrical power into rotational
mechanical power.
(ii) “Expanded scope electric motor” means an electric motor meeting the definition of
“small, non-small-electric-motor electric motor” as defined in Appendix B to Subpart B of Part 431
of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations as in effect on January 1, 2025 “Uniform Test
Method for Measuring the Efficiency of Electric Motors,” excluding any motor incorporated into
a product to which a federal energy conservation standard applies under 10 C.F.R. Parts 430 or
431.
(8)(12) “Electric vehicle supply equipment” means the conductors, including the
ungrounded, grounded, and equipment grounding conductors, the electric vehicle connectors,
attachment plugs, and all other fittings, devices, power outlets, or apparatuses installed specifically
for the purpose of delivering energy from the premises wiring to the electric vehicle. Excludes
conductors, connectors, and fittings that are part of a vehicle.
(13) The following definitions refer to commercial and industrial fans and blowers:
LC004495 - Page 2 of 16

(i) “Fan’’ or ‘‘blower’’ means a rotary bladed machine used to convert electrical or
mechanical power to air power, with an energy output limited to 25 kJ/kg of air. It consists of an
impeller, a shaft and bearings and/or driver to support the impeller, as well as a structure or housing.
A fan or blower may include a transmission, driver, and/or motor controller.
(ii) “Air circulating fan” means a fan that has no provision for connection to ducting or
separation of the fan inlet from its outlet using a pressure boundary, operates against zero external
static pressure loss and is not a jet fan or a ceiling fan.
(iii) “Jet fan” means a fan designed and marketed specifically for producing a high velocity
air jet in a space to increase its air momentum. Jet fans are rated using thrust. Inlets and outlets are
not ducted but may include acoustic silencers.
(iv) “Ceiling fan” means a nonportable device that is suspended from a ceiling for
circulating air via the rotation of fan blades. For the purpose of this definition: Circulating air means
the discharge of air in an upward or downward direction. A ceiling fan that has a ratio of fan blade
span (in inches) to maximum rotation rate (in revolutions per minute) greater than 0.06 provides
circulating air.
(v) “Housed centrifugal air circulating fan” means a housed air circulating fan head with a
centrifugal or radial impeller in which airflow exits into a housing that is generally scroll shaped to
direct the air through a single, narrow fan outlet.
(vi) “Air circulating fan discharge area” means the area of a circle having a diameter equal
to the blade tip diameter.
(vii) “Air circulating fan outlet area” means the gross inside area measured at the plane of
the outlet opening.
(viii) “Equivalent diameter” means the diameter (D) of a circle with the same area as
another geometric shape. For a rectangular cross section with width a and height b, the equivalent
diameter is given as D = (4ab/π)0.5
(ix) “General fan or blower” means a fan or blower that is not an air circulating fan.
(x) “Radial-housed-unshrouded fan” means a radial fan with impeller blades attached to a
backplate and hub (i.e., open radial blade) or a hub only (i.e., open paddle wheel) and with an open
front at the impeller’s inlet.
(xi) “Rimmed radial-unshrouded fan” means a radial-housed unshrouded fan having a
vertical rim on both sides of the impeller.
(xii) “Duty point” means a single airflow, pressure point, and fan air density within the
fan’s operating range.
(9)(14) The following definitions refer to “faucets”:
LC004495 - Page 3 of 16

(i) “Faucet” means a private lavatory faucet, residential kitchen faucet, metering faucet,
public lavatory faucet, or replacement aerator for a private lavatory, public lavatory, or residential
kitchen faucet;
(ii) “Public lavatory faucet” means a fitting designed to be installed in nonresidential
bathrooms that are exposed to walk-in traffic;
(iii) “Metering faucet” means a fitting that, when turned on, will gradually shut itself off
over a period of several seconds; and
(iv) “Replacement aerator” means an aerator sold as a replacement, separate from the
faucet to which it is intended to be attached.
(10)(15) The following definitions refer to “gas fireplaces”:
(i) “Decorative gas fireplace” means a vented fireplace, including appliances that are
freestanding, recessed, zero clearance, or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled by natural gas or
propane, is marked for decorative use only, and is not equipped with a thermostat or intended for
use as a heater;
(ii) “Gas fireplace” means a decorative gas fireplace or a heating gas fireplace; and
(iii) “Heating gas fireplace” means a vented fireplace, including appliances that are
freestanding, recessed, zero clearance, or a gas fireplace insert, that is fueled by natural gas or
propane and is not a decorative fireplace.
(11)(16) “Portable electric spa” means a factory-built electric spa or hot tub that may or
may not include any combination of integral controls, water heating, or water circulating
equipment.
(12)(17) “Residential ventilating fan” means a ceiling or wall-mounted fan, or remotely
mounted in-line fan, designed to be used in a bathroom or utility room for the purpose of moving
air from inside the building to the outdoors.
(13)(18) The following definitions refer to “showerheads”:
(i) “Showerhead” means an accessory to a supply fitting for spraying water onto a bather,
typically from an overhead position and includes a hand-held showerhead, but does not include a
safety showerhead; and
(ii) “Hand-held showerhead” means a showerhead that can be held or fixed in place for the
purpose of spraying water onto a bather and that is connected to a flexible hose.
(14)(19) The following definitions refer to “spray sprinkler bodies”:
(i) “Pressure regulator” means a device that maintains constant operating pressure
immediately downstream from the device, given higher pressure upstream; and
(ii) “Spray sprinkler body” means the exterior case or shell of a sprinkler incorporating a
LC004495 - Page 4 of 16

means of connection to the piping system designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice.
(20) The following definitions apply to state regulated battery charger systems:
(i) "Battery" or "battery pack" means an assembly of one or more rechargeable cells
intended to provide electrical energy to a product, and may be in one of the following forms:
(A) Detachable battery. A battery that is contained in a separate enclosure from the product
and is intended to be removed or disconnected from the product for recharging; or
(B) Integral battery. A battery that is contained within the product and is not removed from
the product for charging purposes.
(ii) "Battery charger system (BCS)" means a battery charger coupled with its battery or
batteries or battery chargers coupled with their batteries, which together are referred to as battery
charger systems. This term covers all rechargeable batteries or devices incorporating a rechargeable
battery and the chargers used with them. Battery charger systems include, but are not limited to:
(A) Electronic devices with a battery that are normally charged from AC line voltage or
DC input voltage through an internal or external power supply and a dedicated battery charger;
(B) The battery and battery charger components of devices that are designed to run on
battery power during part or all of their operations;
(C) Dedicated battery systems primarily designed for electrical or emergency backup;
(D) Devices whose primary function is to charge batteries, along with the batteries they are
designed to charge. These units include chargers for power tool batteries and chargers for
automotive, AA, AAA, C, D, or 9V rechargeable batteries, as well as chargers for batteries used in
larger industrial motive equipment and à la carte chargers.
(E) The charging circuitry of battery charger systems may or may not be located within the
housing of the end-use device itself. In many cases, the battery may be charged with a dedicated
external charger and power supply combination that is separate from the device that runs on power
from the battery
(15)(21) The following definitions refer to “urinals” and “water closets”:
(i) “Dual-flush effective flush volume” means the average flush volume of two (2) reduced
flushes and one full flush;
(ii) “Dual-flush water closet” means a water closet incorporating a feature that allows the
user to flush the water closet with either a reduced or a full volume of water;
(iii) “Plumbing fixture” means an exchangeable device that connects to a plumbing system
to deliver and drain away water and waste;
(iv) “Trough-type urinal” means a urinal designed for simultaneous use by two (2) or more
persons;
LC004495 - Page 5 of 16

(v) “Urinal” means a plumbing fixture that receives only liquid body waste and conveys
the waste through a trap into a drainage system; and
(vi) “Water closet” means a plumbing fixture having a water-containing receptor that
receives liquid and solid body waste through an exposed integral trap into a drainage system.
(16)(22) The following definitions refer to “water coolers”:
(i) “Cold only units” dispense cold water only;
(ii) “Cook and cold units” dispense both cold and room-temperature water;
(iii) “Hot and cold units” dispense both hot and cold water. Provided further that certain
units also offer room-temperature water;
(iv) “On demand” means the water cooler heats water as it is requested, which typically
takes a few minutes to deliver;
(v) “Storage-type” means thermally conditioned water is stored in a tank in the water cooler
and is available instantaneously. Point-of-use, dry storage compartment, and bottled water coolers
are included in this category; and
(vi) “Water cooler” means a freestanding device that consumes energy to cool and/or heat
potable water.
(vii) “WaterSense” means a partnership program by the U.S. Environmental Protection
Agency. Independent, third-party licensed certifying bodies certify that products meet EPA criteria
for water efficiency and performance by following testing and certification protocols specific to
each product category. Products that are certified to meet EPA specifications are allowed to bear
the WaterSense label. (42 U.S.C. § 6294a (Energy Star Program).
39-27.1-3. Scope.
(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to:
(1) Computer server power supply units;
(1)(2) Commercial dishwashers;
(2)(3) Commercial fryers;
(3)(4) Commercial hot-food holding cabinets;
(5) Commercial and industrial fans and blowers;
(4)(6) Commercial ovens;
(5) (7) Commercial steam cookers;
(8) Expanded scope electric motors;
(6)(9) Electric vehicle supply equipment;
(7)(10) Faucets;
(8)(11) Gas fireplaces;
LC004495 - Page 6 of 16

(9)(12) Portable electric spas;
(10)(13) Residential ventilating fans;
(11)(14) Showerheads;
(12)(15) Spray sprinkler bodies;
(16) State-regulated battery charger systems;
(13)(17) Urinals;
(14)(18) Water closets; and
(15)(19) Water coolers.
(b) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) New products manufactured in the state and sold outside the state;
(2) New products manufactured outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for
final retail sale and installation outside the state;
(3) Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction; or
(4) Products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.
39-27.1-4. Standards.
(a) Not later than one year after the date of enactment of this chapter, the commissioner
shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, establishing
minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products set forth in § 39-27.1-3.
(b) The regulations shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards:
(1) Commercial dishwashers included in the scope of the ENERGY STAR Program
Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Dishwashers, Version 2.0, shall meet the
qualification criteria of that specification;
(2) Commercial fryers included in the scope of the ENERGY STAR Program
Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Fryers, Version 2.0 Version 3.0, shall meet
the qualification criteria of that specification;
(3) Commercial hot-food holding cabinets shall meet the qualification criteria of the
ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Hot Food Holding
Cabinets, Version 2.0;
(4) Commercial ovens included in the scope of the ENERGY STAR Program
Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Ovens, Version 2.2 Version 3.0, shall meet
the qualification criteria of that specification;
(5) Commercial steam cookers shall meet the requirements of the ENERGY STAR
Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Steam Cookers, Version 1.2;
(6) Electric vehicle supply equipment included in the scope of the ENERGY STAR
LC004495 - Page 7 of 16

Program Requirements Product Specification for Electric Vehicle Supply Equipment, Version 1.0
(Rev. Apr-2017), shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification;
(7) Faucets, except for metering faucets, shall meet the standards shown in this subsection
when tested in accordance with Appendix S to Subpart B of Part 430 of Title 10 of the Code of
Federal Regulations and compliance with those requirements shall be — “Uniform Test Method
for Measuring the Water Consumption of Faucets and Showerheads” — as in effect on January 1,
2020 and compliance with those requirements shall be:
(i) Lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of one
and five-tenths gallons per minute (1.5 gpm) at sixty pounds per square inch (60 psi) included in
the scope of the WaterSense Specification for Lavatory Faucets, Version 1.0, shall meet a
maximum flow rate of one and two-tenths gallons per minute (1.2 gpm) and meet the performance
criteria and other certification criteria of that specification;
(ii) Residential kitchen faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow
rate of one and eight-tenths gallons per minute (1.8 gpm) at sixty pounds per square inch (60 psi),
with optional temporary flow of two and two-tenths gallons per minute (2.2 gpm), provided they
default to a maximum flow rate of one and eight-tenths gallons per minute (1.8 gpm) at sixty pounds
per square inch (60 psi) after each use; and
(iii) Public lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow
rate of five-tenths gallons per minute (0.5 gpm) at sixty pounds per square inch (60 psi);
(iv) Metering faucets shall not exceed a volumetric measure of water of 0.20 gallons per
activation cycle and shall have no maximum flow rate specified (ie: gallons per minute) when tested
in accordance with Clause 5.4.2.3.1 b) of ASME A112.18.1/CSA B125.1.
(8) Gas fireplaces shall comply with the following requirements:
(i) Gas fireplaces shall be capable of automatically extinguishing any pilot flame when the
main gas burner flame is established and when it is extinguished;
(ii) Gas fireplaces must prevent any ignition source for the main gas burner flame from
operating continuously for more than seven (7) days;
(iii) Decorative gas fireplaces must have a direct vent configuration, unless marked for
replacement use only; and
(iv) Heating gas fireplaces shall have a fireplace efficiency greater than or equal to fifty
percent (50%) when tested in accordance with CSA P.4.1-15, “Testing Method for Measuring
Annual Fireplace Efficiency”;
(9) Portable electric spas shall meet the requirements of the “American National Standard
for Portable Electric Spa Energy Efficiency” (ANSI/APSP/ICC 14-2019);
LC004495 - Page 8 of 16

(10) In-line residential ventilating fans shall have a fan motor efficacy of no less than two
and eight-tenths (2.8) cubic feet per minute per watt. All other residential ventilating fans shall have
a fan motor efficacy of no less than one and four-tenths (1.4) cubic feet per minute per watt for
airflows less than ninety (90) cubic feet per minute and no less than two and eight-tenths (2.8) cubic
feet per minute per watt for other airflows when tested in accordance with Home Ventilation
Institute Publication 916 “HVI Airflow Test Procedure”;
(11) Showerheads shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of two gallons per minute (2.0
gpm) at eighty pounds per square inch (80 psi) when tested in accordance with Appendix S to
Subpart B of Part 430 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations and compliance with those
requirements shall be — “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Water Consumption of Faucets
and Showerheads” — as in effect on January 1, 2020 included in the scope of the WaterSense
Specification for Showerheads Version 1.1 shall meet a maximum flow rate of one and eight-tenths
gallons per minute (1.8 gpm) and meet the performance criteria and other certification criteria of
that specification;
(12) Spray sprinkler bodies that are not specifically excluded from the scope of the
WaterSense Specification for Spray Sprinkler Bodies, Version 1.0, shall include an integral
pressure regulator and shall meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and other
requirements of that specification;
(13) Urinals and water closets, other than those designed and marketed exclusively for use
at prisons or mental health facilities, shall meet the standards shown in subsections (b)(13)(i)
through (b)(13)(iv) of this section when tested in accordance with Appendix T to Subpart B of Part
430 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations — “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the
Water Consumption of Water Closets and Urinals” — as in effect on January 1, 2020, and water
closets shall pass the waste extraction test for water closets (Section 7.9) of the American Society
of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) A112.19.2/CSA B45.1-2018:
(i) Wall-mounted urinals, except for trough-type urinals, shall have a maximum flush
volume of five-tenths (0.5) gallons per flush;
(ii) Floor-mounted urinals, except for trough-type urinals, shall have a maximum flush
volume of five-tenths (0.5) gallons per flush;
(iii) Water closets, except for dual-flush tank-type water closets, shall have a maximum
flush volume of one and twenty-eight hundredths (1.28) gallons per flush; and
(iv) Dual-flush tank-type water closets shall have a maximum dual flush effective flush
volume of one and twenty-eight hundredths (1.28) gallons per flush;
(14) Water coolers included in the scope of the ENERGY STAR Program Requirements
LC004495 - Page 9 of 16

Product Specification for Water Coolers, Version 2.0, shall have on mode with no water draw
energy consumption less than or equal to the following values as measured in accordance with the
test requirements of that program:
(i) Sixteen hundredths kilowatt hours (0.16 KWh) per day for cold-only units and cook and
cold units;
(ii) Eighty-seven hundredths kilowatt hours (0.87 KWh) per day for storage type hot and
cold units; and
(iii) Eighteen hundredths kilowatt hours (0.18 KWh) per day for on demand hot and cold
units.
(15) Computer server power supply units for computer servers included in the scope of the
ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Computer Servers, Version 4.0,
shall meet the certification criteria of that specification.
(16) The regulations shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards:
(i) Commercial and industrial fans and blowers shall comply with the following
requirements:
(A) Air circulating fans shall have a minimum efficiency (Effcirc), in cubic feet per minute
per watt, at maximum speed of greater than or equal to the sum of sixteen times D to the fifth power
and two hundred times D to the fourth power, all divided by Q squared, when tested in accordance
with Appendix B to Subpart J of Part 431 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations as in effect
on January 1, 2025, “Uniform Test Method for the Measurement of Energy Consumption of Air
Circulating Fans,” Effcirc is the minimum efficacy for air circulating fans (CFM/W). D is the
impeller diameter for unhoused fans, and the lesser of impeller diameter and equivalent diameter
for housed fans (inches). Q is the air circulating fan airflow rate, determined by the referenced test
procedure at the maximum fan speed (cfm).
(B) Represented values of performance ratings for air circulating fans used to demonstrate
compliance with the efficacy requirements shall be determined in accordance with 10 C.F.R. §
429.69, “Certification, Compliance, and Enforcement for Consumer Products and Commercial and
Industrial Equipment” as in effect on January 1, 2025.
(C) The standards for air circulating fans do not apply to:
(I) Housed centrifugal air circulating fans;
(II) Air circulating fans with input power less than two hundred watts (200W) at maximum
speed; or
(III) Air circulating fans where water is evaporated in the air stream of the fan.
(D) General fans and blowers within the scope of 10 C.F.R. § 431.174(a) as in effect on
LC004495 - Page 10 of 16

January 1, 2025, shall have a fan energy index (FEI) no less than 1.05 at each duty point for which
the fan is offered for sale when tested in accordance with Appendix A to Subpart J of Part 431 of
Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations as in effect on January 1, 2025, “ Uniform Test Method
for the Measurement of Energy Consumption of Fans and Blowers Other Than Air Circulating Fans
including, but not limited to, provisions on alternative efficiency determination methods (AEDMs)
and additional testing requirements concerning selection of models to be tested if an AEDM is to
be applied in 10 C.F.R. § 429.69 and § 429.70 as in effect on January 1, 2025. General fans and
blowers may also be tested in accordance with Sections 6.4 and 6.5 of ANSI/AMCA Standard 214-
21, Test Procedure for Calculating Fan Energy Index (FEI) for Commercial and Industrial Fans and
Blowers.”
(E) The standards for general fans and blowers do not apply to:
(I) Fans and blowers embedded in the equipment listed in paragraph (a)(3) of 10 C.F.R. §
431.174(a)(3) as in effect on January 1, 2025;
(II) Fans and blowers embedded in equipment other than the equipment listed [subsection
5(a)] that are available only as part of a manufactured assembly that includes functions other than
air movement or as a replacement part for that assembly;
(III) Any other fan type listed as exempt in 10 C.F.R. § 431.174(a) as in effect on January
1, 2025;
(IV) Radial-housed-unshrouded fans; or
(V) Rimmed radial-unshrouded fans.
(VI) A fan or blower shall be deemed to be offered for sale at a duty point if:
(aa) The selection software provided by the manufacturer or seller returns such fan or
blower as recommended for use at such duty point; or
(bb) The manufacturer or seller otherwise knowingly sells a fan or blower to an end user
who intends to use the fan or blower at such duty point.
(17) Expanded scope electric motors with a power rating of greater than or equal to twenty-
five hundredths (0.25) horsepower and less than or equal to three (3) horsepower shall meet the
minimum efficiency standards outlined in “Energy Conservation Program: Energy Conservation
Standards for Expanded Scope Electric Motors” (88 Fed. Reg. 87062, published December 15,
2023) when tested in accordance with Appendix B to Subpart B of Part 431 of Title 10 of the Code
of Federal Regulations as in effect on January 1, 2025.
(18) Large battery charger systems and battery backup or UPS systems shall meet the
requirements of § 39-27.1-2(20) and compliance with those requirements shall be as measured in
accordance with test methods prescribed in § 1604(w) of those regulations.
LC004495 - Page 11 of 16

(i) The rules shall define “large battery charger system” and “battery backup or
uninterruptible power supply charger (UPS)” to have the same meaning as set forth in § 39-27.1-
2(20).
39-27.1-5. Implementation.
(a) No commercial dishwasher, commercial fryer, commercial hot-food holding cabinet,
commercial oven, commercial steam cooker, electric vehicle supply equipment, faucet, gas
fireplace, portable electric spa, residential ventilating fan, showerhead, spray sprinkler body, urinal,
water closet, or water cooler manufactured on or after January 1, 2023, may be sold or offered for
sale, lease, or rent in the state unless the new product meets the requirements of the standards
provided in this chapter.
(b) One year after the date upon which the sale or offering for sale of certain products
becomes subject to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, no such products may be
installed for compensation in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds
the efficiency standards provided in § 39-27.1-4.
(c) No commercial dishwasher, commercial oven, computer server power supply unit,
faucet, general fan or blower, or showerhead manufactured on or after January 1, 2028, may be
sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the state unless the new product meets the requirements of
the standards provided in this chapter. On or after January 1, 2029, no new expanded scope electric
motor may be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the state unless the new product meets the
requirements of the standards provided in § 39-27.1-4.
39-27.1-6. New and revised standards.
(a) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
35 of title 42, to establish increased efficiency standards for the products listed or incorporated in
§ 39-27.1-3. In considering the new or amended standards, the commissioner shall set efficiency
standards upon a determination that increased efficiency standards would serve to promote energy
or water conservation in the state and would be cost effective for consumers who purchase and use
these new products; provided that, no new or increased efficiency standards shall become effective
within one year following the adoption of any amended regulations establishing such increased
efficiency standards.
(b) If any of the energy or water conservation standards issued or approved for publication
by the Office of the United States Secretary of Energy as of January 19, 2025, pursuant to the
Energy Policy and Conservation Act (Parts 430-431 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations),
are withdrawn, repealed, or otherwise voided, the minimum energy or water efficiency level
permitted for products previously subject to federal energy or water conservation standards in this
LC004495 - Page 12 of 16

state shall be the applicable federal standards as of January 19, 2025, and no such new product may
be sold or offered for sale, lease or rent in this state unless it meets or exceeds such standards. This
section shall not apply to any federal energy or water conservation standard set aside by a court
upon the petition of a person who will be adversely affected, as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 6306(b).
39-27.1-7. Testing — Certification — Labeling — Enforcement.
(a) The manufacturers of products covered by this chapter shall test samples of their
products in accordance with the test procedures adopted pursuant to this chapter. The commissioner
may adopt updated test methods when new versions of test procedures become available.
(b) Manufacturers of new products covered by § 39-27.1-3 shall certify to the
commissioner that the products are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The
certifications shall be based on test results. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations
governing the certification of the products and shall coordinate with the certification programs of
other states and federal agencies with similar standards.
(c) Manufacturers of new products covered by § 39-27.1-3 shall identify each product
offered for sale or installation in the state as in compliance with the provisions of this chapter by
means of a mark, label, or tag on the product and packaging at the time of sale or installation. The
commissioner shall promulgate regulations governing the identification of the products and
packaging, which shall be coordinated to the greatest practical extent with the labeling programs
of other states and federal agencies with equivalent efficiency standards. The commissioner shall
allow the use of existing marks, labels, or tags, that connote compliance with the efficiency
requirements of this chapter.
(d) The commissioner may test products covered by § 39-27.1-3. If products so tested are
found not to be in compliance with the minimum efficiency standards established under § 39-27.1-
4, the commissioner shall:
(1) Charge the manufacturer of such product for the cost of product purchase and testing;
and
(2) Make information available to the attorney general and the public on products found
not to be in compliance with the standards.
(e) With prior notice and at reasonable and convenient hours, the commissioner may cause
periodic inspections to be made of distributors or retailers of new products covered by § 39-27.1-3
in order to determine compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner shall also
coordinate with the state building code standards committee regarding inspections prior to
occupancy of newly constructed buildings containing new products that are also covered by chapter
27.3 of title 23.
LC004495 - Page 13 of 16

(f) The commissioner shall investigate complaints received concerning violations of this
chapter and shall report the results of the investigations to the attorney general. The attorney general
may institute proceedings to enforce the provisions of this chapter. Any manufacturer, distributor,
or retailer, or any person who installs a product covered by this chapter for compensation, who or
that violates any provision of this chapter shall be issued a warning by the commissioner for any
first violation and subject to a civil penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
Repeat violations shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500)
for each offense. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense, and each day that the violation
continues shall constitute a separate offense. Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition
to costs assessed under subsection (d) of this section.
(g) The commissioner may adopt such further regulations as necessary to ensure the proper
implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.
(h) The manufacturers of products covered by this chapter shall test samples of their
products in accordance with the test procedures found in the Energy Policy and Conservation Act
(Parts 430-431 of Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations) as of January 19, 2025, in accordance
with the federal test procedures as in place on January 19, 2025. Rhode Island Energy may adopt
updated test methods by regulation when new versions of test methods become available or when
an alternative test method has been adopted by another state or the federal government.
(i) Manufacturers of new products covered by this chapter shall certify that such products
are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter to the Modernized Appliance Efficiency
Database System, the State Appliance Standards Database, and the Certified Products Directory,
or to an approved third-party database as determined by the Rhode Island office of energy
resources. Such certifications shall be based on test results. The agency may promulgate regulations
further governing the certification of such products and may coordinate with the certification
programs of other states and federal agencies with similar standards.
(j) Initial test requirements for general fans and blowers. Unless the commissioner amends
the requirements pursuant to this section, for general fans and blowers, test results may be based
on a single unit (sample) or may include use of an alternative efficiency determination method, in
accordance with the requirements of 10 C.F.R. § 429.69 and § 429.70 (88 Fed. Reg. 27312, 27387–
27389, published May 1, 2023, with technical amendments at 88 Fed. Reg. 53371, 53375-53377,
published August 8, 2023), as existing at the time of enactment.
(k) Labels for commercial and industrial fans and blowers. For general fans and blowers
and air circulating fans, the following information shall be legibly and conspicuously displayed in
an accessible place on each physical unit:
LC004495 - Page 14 of 16

(1) Manufacturer's name or brand name or trademark (i.e., either the name, brand, or
trademark of the listed manufacturer) as provided pursuant to the provisions of § 39-27.1-7(c);
(2) Model number; and
(3) Date or date code of manufacture, indicating year and month.
(l) Additional requirements applicable to fans and blowers. Testing of general fans and
blowers and air circulating fans shall be performed by a laboratory that:
(1) Has proof of compliance with ISO/IEC 17025 “General requirements for the
competence of testing and calibration laboratories” from a third-party accreditation body; and
(2) Is accredited by AMCA International Inc. to perform testing in accordance with at least
one of the following:
(i) ANSI/AMCA Standard 210 “Laboratory Methods of Testing Fans for Certified
Aerodynamic Performance Rating”;
(ii) ISO Standard 5801, “Fans -- Performance testing using standardized airways”;
(iii) ANSI/AMCA Standard 230 “Laboratory Methods of Testing Air Circulating Fans for
Rating and Certification.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004495
========
LC004495 - Page 15 of 16